Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
ARTICLE 12
MOTOR VEHICLES AS COLLECTOR'S ITEMS

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1984. This title was amended with relocations in 1994, and this article was subsequently amended with relocations in 2011, resulting in the addition, relocation, or elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2011, consult the 2010 Colorado Revised Statutes, the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume, and the editor's note following the title heading. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article for 2011, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 STREET-ROD VEHICLES

PART 3 SPECIAL REGISTRATION OF
HORSELESS CARRIAGES AND ORIGINAL PLATES

PART 4 COLLECTOR'S ITEMS